District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.28

Loitering of public vehicles-for-hire.

(a)

No operator of a public vehicle-for-hire shall loiter around or in front of hotels, restaurants, theaters, or public buildings in the District. For the purposes of this section, the term “loitering” means the willful operation of a public vehicle-for-hire for the purpose of soliciting passengers by stopping the vehicle, or by driving at such a slow speed as may impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for a hotel, restaurant, or theater, or keeper or proprietor or agent acting for the keeper or proprietor, of a hotel, restaurant, or theater in the District to discriminate against a District licensed taxicab operator by excluding the operator from access to a hack stand or other location where taxicabs are regularly allowed to pick up passengers on the hotel premises; provided, that a taxicab or taxicab operator that is not in compliance with taxicab vehicle safety requirements or operator requirements may be denied a passenger and reported to the Commission.

(c)

It shall be unlawful for a hotel, restaurant, or theater, or keeper or proprietor or agent acting for the keeper or proprietor of a hotel, restaurant, or theater in the District to solicit, or offer to solicit passengers on behalf of a public vehicle-for-hire operator, company, or association if the resulting trip would violate this subchapter. This subsection shall not prohibit a hotel, restaurant, or theater from entering into a written contract to provide its customers with the services of public vehicles-for-hire on a pre-arranged basis, as long as these services are provided in a manner that complies with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to public vehicles-for-hire in the District.

(d)

The Commission shall have authority to determine, by rule, appropriate fines and penalties for violations of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20i
as added Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(s), 59 DCR 9431
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-270, § 2(h), 60 DCR 1717

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-270 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.

Section 7017 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-270, § 5.

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see § 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-270 rewrote the section.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 added this section.
2001 Ed., § 50-328.